Tennessee, session 114, SB1091.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-4-2109(r)(1), is amended by
inserting the language ", and the office of legislative budget analysis" immediately after the
language "and the senate".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1091
003176
- 1 -